Alabama, session 2026rs, SB364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-40-13 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§16-40-13
(a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, each
public school student shall complete a course or program in
violence prevention, conflict resolution, and mediation before
graduation from high school. The instruction shall be provided
to students in grades six through twelve and shall include a
discussion of or instruction in all of the following:
(1) Responsible decision-making.
(2) The causes and effects of school violence and
harassment, cultural diversity, and nonviolent methods for
resolving conflict, including peer mediation.
(3) The consequences of violent behavior.
(4) The causes of violent reactions to conflict.
(5) Nonviolent conflict resolution techniques.
(6) The relationship between drugs, alcohol, and
violence.
(7) The implementation of voluntary peer mediation
Page 1

(7) The implementation of voluntary peer mediation
SB364 Enrolled
programs and the integration of conflict resolution models in
classrooms.
(b) Before June 30, 2027, the State Department of
Education shall prepare and make available to all local boards
of education instructional materials, models, and curricula
that may be used as guidelines for development of a violence
prevention, conflict resolution, and mediation course or
program. Each local board of education shall determine the
appropriate curriculum for satisfying the requirements of this
section. The State Department of Education shall assist in
training teachers to provide effective instruction in violence
prevention, conflict resolution, and mediation.
(c) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules as
necessary to implement this section.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
SB364 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB364
Senate 01-Apr-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 09-Apr-26




By: Senator Smitherman
Page 3